Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.092

Early achievers program—Administrative policies—Various.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must adopt administrative policies in the early achievers program to:

(1) Eliminate rating scale barriers, to the extent possible, within the assessment tools and data collection methodologies used in the early achievers program and weight early achievers points to incentivize providers to serve infants and toddlers;

(2) Remove barriers to timely approvals for one-on-one behavioral support assistants when requested by a provider; and

(3) Require trauma-informed care training for raters and coaches.

[ 2019 c 369 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 369: See note following RCW 43.216.091.